District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1982

Teacher retirement provisions applicable to certain employees.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 529, ch. 569, title V, § 19
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1013, Pub. L. 92-518, title II, § 202(b)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 11, 29 DCR 49

History

Schoolteachers, retirees, reemployment as substitute teachers, see § 38-1910.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 31-1148.
1973 Ed., § 31-1548.

Prior Codifications